Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Subchapter 1. Snowmobiles

§ 3201.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Commissioner” means Commissioner of Motor Vehicles unless otherwise stated.

“Department” means Department of Motor Vehicles unless otherwise stated.

“Operate” includes an attempt to operate and shall be construed to cover all matters and things connected with the presence and use of snowmobiles whether they be at motion or rest.

“Secretary” means the Secretary of the Agency of Natural Resources.

“Snowmobile” means a self-propelled vehicle intended for off-road travel primarily on snow, having a curb weight of not more than 793.783 kg (1,750 lbs.); driven by track or tracks in contact with the snow; and steered by a ski or skis in contact with the snow. The maximum width of a snowmobile shall be no more than 48 inches. An all-terrain vehicle converted to operate with tracks shall not be considered to be a snowmobile.

“VAST” means the Vermont Association of Snow Travelers.

“Trails maintenance assessment” (TMA) means a permit issued by the Vermont Association of Snow Travelers, Inc. granting use of Vermont snowmobile trails on public and private land. TMAs shall be issued in three different classifications: Vermont resident snowmobiles, nonresident snowmobiles, and commercial operation.

“Public land” means all land that is either owned or controlled by a local, State, or federal governmental body.

“Commercial operation” means the operation of a snowmobile on the SSTS by an individual participating in a guided tour or who has rented a snowmobile from an individual or corporate entity charging a fee for the tour or rental.

“Direct supervision” means sufficiently close and able to control, by communicating visually or orally, the operation of a snowmobile by an operator under 16 years of age, taking into account the noise created by snowmobiles and protective headgear worn by the operator.

“Tour” means a snowmobile ride led by a guide or leader over a defined route or routes lasting anywhere from one-half hour to less than a day and participated in by one or more individuals that have paid a fee to an individual or corporate entity for the privilege of riding a snowmobile.

“Closed season” shall be defined as the time from April 16 to December 15.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1987, No. 76

, § 18;

1993, No. 234

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Nov. 1, 1994;

1995, No. 64

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 2, eff. Jan. 30, 1996;

1997, No. 3

, § 1, eff. March 8, 1997;

1999, No. 20

, §§ 2, 3;

2001, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 12, 2002;

2003, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 1, 2;

2005, No. 175

(Adj. Sess.), § 45.

§ 3202.
Registration and TMA decal required; exceptions.

Registration and decal required. A person shall not operate a snowmobile in this State unless it is registered and numbered by the State of Vermont or another state or province and displays a valid Vermont Trails Maintenance Assessment (TMA) decal adjacent to the registration decal on the left side of the snowmobile in accordance with this chapter, except when operated:

On the property of the owner of the snowmobile.

Off the highway, in a ski area while being used for the purpose of packing snow, or in rescue operations.

For official use by a federal, State, or municipal agency and only if the snowmobile is identified with the name or seal of the agency in a manner approved by the Commissioner.

Solely on privately owned land when the operator has the written consent of the owner, or his or her agent, of the property.

On frozen bodies of water as designated by the Agency of Natural Resources under the provisions of

10 V.S.A. § 2607

. For purposes of this subdivision, a snowmobile shall not be required to display a TMA decal if not operating on a portion of the Statewide Snowmobile Trail System. Liability insurance as provided for in subdivision 3206(b)(19) of this title and a valid registration decal are required.

For emergency use by fire service personnel.

By a person who possesses a completed TMA form processed electronically and either printed out or displayed on a portable electronic device. The printed or electronic TMA form shall be valid for 10 days after the electronic transaction. Use of a portable electronic device to display a completed TMA form does not in itself constitute consent for an enforcement officer to access other contents of the device.

Registration period. The registration year for snowmobiles is from September 1 to August 31.

Use of snowmobile on public or private lands. The registration of a snowmobile does not in and by itself constitute a license to cross or operate a snowmobile on public or private lands.

Equipment condition and number. A snowmobile that does not comply with the provisions of section 3205 of this title or that has had its motor or serial number altered may not be registered by the Commissioner.

Special decal exemptions. A snowmobile legally registered in another state or province may enter and operate in this State without a TMA decal as follows:

Using a portion of the Statewide Snowmobile Trail System, a public right-of-way open to snowmobiles, or private land that is posted open to snowmobiles, for a distance not to exceed three miles for the sole purpose of accessing the closest food, fuel, lodging, and repair services. At a point three miles from the State line, trails shall be posted “VT TMA Required Beyond This Point.”

In Addison, Bennington, and Rutland Counties, from the New York border to Poultney village via corridor trail 4A (Delaware Hudson Rail Trail); from the New York border in Pawlet in the north to the New York border in the south in the town of Rupert (13 miles) along corridor trail 4; and from Lake Champlain at Benson Landing to the town of Benson via the local snowmobile trail.

For the purpose of accessing international customs services, on the so-called “Keyhole Trail,” for a distance of approximately one-half mile from United States/Canadian Customs at Beecher Falls to the town line of Pittsburg, New Hampshire, and for a distance of approximately four miles via Vermont Association of Snow Travelers snowmobile corridor 105 to Canaan and to the West Stewartstown, New Hampshire bridge connecting to the New Hampshire 3A snowmobile trail on the Beecher Falls to Colebrook, New Hampshire railbed, and on immediately adjacent areas for services.

In Essex County, for a distance of approximately 18 miles to and from the New Hampshire border to the village of Beecher Falls in the town of Canaan, via Vermont Association of Snow Travelers snowmobile trails 103 to 96 to 105/96 to 105.

The Commissioner may authorize the temporary operation of snowmobiles on designated regular or temporary trails for special events.

-(h) [Repealed.]

(i)

Authority of Agency of Natural Resources.

Nothing in this section relating to operation on frozen bodies of water shall be construed to affect the authority of the Agency of Natural Resources to regulate uses of public bodies of water.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1987, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

1989, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Feb. 23, 1990;

1991, No. 119

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Feb. 21, 1992;

1993, No. 1

, § 1, eff. Feb. 19, 1993;

1993, No. 234

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Nov. 1, 1994;

1995, No. 64

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Jan. 30, 1996;

1997, No. 3

, § 2, eff. March 8, 1997;

1999, No. 20

, § 4;

1999, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

2001, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. June 12, 2002;

2003, No. 115

(Adj. Sess.), § 75, eff. Jan. 31, 2005;

2003, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 4;

2011, No. 138

(Adj. Sess.), § 27, eff. May 14, 2012;

2011, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 8;

2013, No. 189

(Adj. Sess.), § 22.

§ 3203.
Termination of registration.

The registration of a snowmobile ends when the owner transfers title to another. The former owner shall immediately return to the Commissioner the registration certificate previously assigned to the transferred snowmobile with the date of sale, name, and residence of the new owner endorsed on the back thereof. When a person transfers the ownership of a registered snowmobile to another, files a new application, and pays a fee of $3.00, he or she may have registered in his or her name another snowmobile for the remainder of the registration year without payment of any additional registration fee.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 46.

§ 3204.
Registration fees and dealer plates.

Fees. Annual registration fees for snowmobiles other than as provided for in subsection (b) of this section are $28.00 for residents and $36.00 for nonresidents. Duplicate registration certificates may be obtained upon payment of $6.00.

Dealer registration and plates; manufacturer plates; fees.

A person engaged in the business of selling or exchanging snowmobiles as defined in subdivision 4(8) of this title shall register as a dealer and obtain registration certificates and identifying number plates, subject to such rules as may be adopted by the Commissioner and to the requirements of chapter 7 of this title. A manufacturer of snowmobiles may register and obtain registration certificates and identifying number plates under this section. Plates shall be valid for the following purposes only: testing; adjusting; demonstrating; temporary use of customers for a period not to exceed 14 days; private business or pleasure use of such person or members of his or her immediate family; and use at fairs, shows, or races when no charge is made for such use.

Fees for dealer registration certificates shall be $55.00 for the first certificate issued to any person and $6.00 for any additional certificate issued to the same person within the current registration period. Fees for temporary number plates shall be $3.00 for each plate issued.

Temporary registration pending issuance of permanent registration. The Commissioner, by rules adopted pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25, shall provide for the issuance of temporary registrations of snowmobiles pending issuance of the permanent registration. VAST shall be an agent of the Commissioner for the issuance of such temporary registrations. The fees for the temporary registrations shall be $28.00 for residents and $36.00 for nonresidents and shall also constitute payment of the registration fee required by subsection (a) of this section. VAST shall promptly remit any fees collected to the Commissioner in accordance with rules adopted under this subsection. Temporary registrations shall be kept with the snowmobile while being operated and shall authorize operation without the registration decal being affixed for a period not to exceed 60 days from the date of issue.

Delegation. The Commissioner may authorize the Vermont Association of Snow Travelers, or its successor, and its agents to register snowmobiles, or to renew or assist with renewal of registrations, for residents and nonresidents.

Fee setting. Only the General Assembly may change the fees provided for in this section.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1985, No. 250

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1987, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1989, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. Feb. 23, 1990;

1993, No. 234

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. Nov. 1, 1994;

2001, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 29, eff. May 15, 2002;

2009, No. 50

, § 57;

2011, No. 164

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

2015, No. 50

, § 3;

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 47;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 232.

§ 3204a.
Antique snowmobiles.

The one-time registration fee for a snowmobile that is at least 25 years old and is used exclusively in exhibitions, parades, and public functions shall be $50.00. The registration process for snowmobiles registered under this section shall be the same as provided in section 3204 of this title.

The owner of a snowmobile that satisfies the criteria established in subsection (a) of this section shall be entitled to display antique snowmobile plates that shall be distributed according to rules adopted by the Commissioner.

HISTORY:

Added

1999, No. 144

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2015, No. 159

(Adj. Sess.), § 48.

§ 3205.
Snowmobile equipment; windshield; use of headlight; illegal noise level; exemption from equipment requirement.

Snowmobile; required equipment. All snowmobiles shall be equipped with one or more operational:

headlight;

red rear light;

a fully functional brake in good mechanical condition;

efficient muffler; and

such other equipment and devices as may be required to meet the noise level specifications of subsection (d) of this section.

Windshield. If the snowmobile is equipped with a windshield, it shall be free from sharp or jagged edges.

Light. Lights shall be on during operation and the lenses of headlights shall be clear, as supplied by the manufacturer, and unimpaired by the installation of colored lenses or other devices that would impair the ability of the headlight to perform to its original equipment design specifications.

Exhaust system; noise emissions. An individual shall not operate the following on the State Snowmobile Trail System:

a snowmobile manufactured after February 1, 2007 that does not display a visible and unaltered marking of “SSCC Certified” issued by the Snowmobile Safety and Certification Committee (SSCC) on all critical components of the exhaust system; or

a snowmobile, regardless of the date of manufacture, with an exhaust system that has been modified in a manner that amplifies or otherwise increases total noise emission above that of the snowmobile as originally constructed.

Prohibited sale; illegal noise level; notice to consumer.

No person shall sell for operation, or offer to sell for operation, within the State of Vermont, a snowmobile that does not comply with the exhaust system requirements specified in subsection (d) of this section.

No snowmobile shall be equipped in any manner that permits the operator to bypass the muffler.

No person shall sell or offer to sell a replacement exhaust system or component of an exhaust system that will not meet or exceed the exhaust noise reduction capabilities of the snowmobile manufacturer’s original equipment specifications for the snowmobile.

Any person selling or offering to sell a snowmobile or replacement exhaust system shall include in the specifications precise information concerning the designed maximum sound levels of the snowmobile or replacement exhaust system as outlined by the SSCC.

Exemption from equipment requirements; racing contest. This section shall not apply to any snowmobile entered in a racing contest sponsored by a racing or snowmobile club, organization, or association during the period the snowmobile is actually participating in or practicing or preparing for a racing event at an area especially provided for the purpose.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1993, No. 234

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Nov. 1, 1994;

2001, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. June 12, 2002;

2015, No. 47

, § 46;

2021, No. 20

, § 250;

2021, No. 76

, § 8.

§ 3206.
Operation on and across public highways, sidewalks; age restrictions; private lands; prohibited areas and prohibited methods of operation; reckless operation; SWI; financial responsibility; trail access limited; head and face protection.

A person shall operate, or cause to be operated, a snowmobile only in accordance with this chapter.

A snowmobile shall not be operated:

Across or on a plowed public highway unless:

the crossing is made at an angle of approximately 90 degrees to the direction of the highway and at a place where no obstruction prevents a quick and safe crossing; and

the operator brings the snowmobile to a complete stop before entering the traveled portion of the highway; and

the operator yields the right of way to motor vehicles and pedestrians using the highway; and

the operator is 16 years of age or older. If the operator is under 16 years of age but at least 12 years of age, that operator must be under the direct supervision of a person 18 years of age or older.

On a public highway, unless it is not being maintained and plowed for use by motor vehicles during the snow season.

On a public highway, unless the operator is not closer than five feet from the plowed portion. However, this section shall not apply to class IV roads or trails that are privately maintained or plowed.

On a public highway, unless the highway has been opened to snowmobile travel by the selectmen or trustees or local governing body and is so posted by the municipality.

On any privately owned land or body of private water unless:

the operator is the owner, or member of the immediate family of the owner or lessee of the land or private body of water; or

the operator has, on his or her person, the written consent of the owner or lessee of the land to operate a snowmobile in the specific area in which the operator is operating, or the snowmobile displays a valid TMA decal as required by subsection 3202(a) of this title that serves as proof that the snowmobile and its operator by virtue of the TMA are members of a VAST-affiliated snowmobile club to which such consent has been given orally or in writing; or

the owner of the land has designated the area for use by snowmobiles by posting the area in a manner approved by the Secretary to give reasonable notice that snowmobiling is permitted.

On any public land, body of public water, or natural area established under the provisions of

10 V.S.A. § 2607

, or other State, federal statute, or municipal ordinance, unless the Secretary has designated such area for use by snowmobiles in manners chosen by the Secretary or other public land manager.

By a child under eight years of age unless he or she is on land owned by his or her parents, family, or legal guardian.

By a person born after July 1, 1983, on private or public land and water without first obtaining a certificate of snowmobile education, unless he or she is operating on land owned, leased, or farmed by his or her parents, family, or guardian or the operator is the land owner.

A person who is required to have a certificate of snowmobile education shall:

possess the certificate or a copy of the certificate when operating a snowmobile on public or private lands and waters of the State; and

show the certificate or a copy of the certificate on demand of an enforcement officer wearing an insignia identifying him or her as a law enforcement officer. No person charged with violating this subdivision shall be convicted if the person produces in court, to the officer, or to a State’s Attorney, a certificate or a copy of the certificate that was valid at the time the violation occurred. A person may show an electronic copy of the certificate using a portable electronic device; however, use of a device for this purpose does not in itself constitute consent for an enforcement officer to access other contents of the device.

The following persons are exempt from the requirements of this subdivision:

a person is operating on land owned by his or her parents, family, or guardian or the operator is the landowner;

any other person exempted by rules of the Department of Public Safety;

any person who is under the direct supervision of a certified snowmobile safety instructor;

a child not yet 12 years of age, but not younger than eight when under the direct supervision of a parent or legal guardian who shall be liable for the actions of the child.

The Department of Public Safety shall adopt rules:

That establish criteria for a course of instruction in snowmobile safety education.

Relating to transient snowmobilers.

To administer a verbal test when appropriate.

To coordinate a statewide program of snowmobile safety instruction and certification and ensure that a course of safety education is available within each county.

That a course of snowmobile safety education is available at the age of eight. Any child eight years of age but not yet 12 who passes the course may operate a snowmobile only when under the direct supervision of a parent or legal guardian who shall be liable for the actions of the child.

Any course of snowmobile safety education that is offered shall provide a minimum of six hours of instruction.

Any State-certified instructor may offer a course of instruction in snowmobile safety education approved by the Department of Public Safety.

The Department of Public Safety or its designee shall issue a certificate of snowmobile safety education to a person who:

passes a departmentally prescribed course of snowmobile safety education; or

passes a snowmobile safety equivalency examination administered by persons authorized to offer a course of snowmobile safety education.

Upon request, the Department of Public Safety shall provide, without charge, snowmobile safety education materials to persons who plan to take the snowmobile safety equivalency examination.

Once issued, the certificate of snowmobile education is valid for the lifetime of the person to whom it was issued and may not be revoked by the Department of Public Safety or a court of law.

The Department of Public Safety shall replace, without charge, a lost or destroyed certificate if the Department issued the certificate or has a record that the certificate was issued.

A snowmobile safety certificate issued in another state or country in accordance with or substantially equivalent to criteria of the International Association of Snowmobile Administrators is sufficient to comply with the requirements of this section.

In any manner intended, or could reasonably be expected to, harass, drive, or pursue any wildlife; or
(9) (A) In any manner intended, or could reasonably be expected to, harass, drive, or pursue any wildlife; or

In any manner intended to cause an animal undue pain or suffering.

If the registration certificate or written consent is not available for inspection and the registration number, or plate of a size and type approved by the Commissioner, and TMA decal are not displayed on the snowmobile in a manner approved by the Commissioner. However, a TMA decal need not be displayed if the operator possesses a completed TMA form in accordance with subdivision 3202(a)(7) of this title.

While the operator is under the influence of drugs or alcohol as defined in section 3207a of this title.

In a reckless manner so as to endanger a person or property.

Within any cemetery, public or private, as defined in

18 V.S.A. § 5302

.

On limited access highways, rights-of-way, or approaches unless permitted by the Agency of Transportation. In no case shall snowmobiling be permitted on any portion of the Dwight D. Eisenhower National System of Interstate and Defense Highways unless the Agency of Transportation permits operation on such highways.

On a sidewalk unless permitted by the selectmen or trustees or the local governing body.

While the person’s privilege to operate a snowmobile has been suspended.

In an unreasonable or imprudent manner, and:

No person shall drive a snowmobile on the Statewide Snowmobile Trail System or a public right-of-way, open to snowmobiling, at a speed greater than is reasonable and prudent under the conditions, having regard for the actual and potential hazards there existing. In every event, speed shall be controlled as necessary to avoid collision with any person, vehicle, snowmobile, or other object on or adjacent to the snowmobile trail.

The operator of every snowmobile shall drive at an appropriate reduced speed when approaching and crossing an intersection or railway grade crossing, when approaching and going around a curve, when approaching a hill crest, when traveling upon any narrow or winding trail, and when a special hazard exists with respect to pedestrians or other traffic by reason of weather or trail conditions.

Snowmobiles operating on a public right-of-way open to snowmobiling shall comply with the provisions established in sections 1003, 1007, and 1008 of this title.

The maximum speed limit on State lands and public waters shall be determined by the Agency of Natural Resources.

Any law enforcement officer or emergency personnel may disregard speed regulations in accordance with section 1015 of this title.

In a commercial manner unless the individual or entity offering the snowmobile for rent or hired for tour complies with the following:

On any privately owned land or body of private water, unless the individual or entity offering a snowmobile for commercial operation has first obtained the written consent of the snowmobile club responsible for obtaining landowner permission for snowmobile trails and for trail maintenance in that area with consent from the proper owner over whose property the trail passes.

For commercial purposes, on any public land, body of public water, or natural area, unless the individual or entity has first obtained the written consent of the snowmobile club responsible for trail maintenance, and the Secretary or other public land manager has designated such area for use by snowmobiles in a manner chosen by the Secretary or public land manager to give reasonable notice that snowmobiling is permitted. The commercial operation of snowmobiles on public land or public water shall be by permit or license issued by the Secretary or public land manager in a manner chosen by the Secretary or public land manager.

A commercial snowmobile operating on any private or public land, private or public water, or natural area shall display a commercial TMA.

A commercial snowmobile operating on any private or public land, private or public water, or natural area shall display a decal or flag identifying the individual or entity that owns the snowmobile.

Without liability insurance as described in this subdivision. No owner or operator of a snowmobile shall operate or permit the operation of the snowmobile on the Statewide Snowmobile Trail System or public right of way, except on the property of the owner, without having in effect a liability policy or bond in the amounts of at least $25,000.00 for one person and $50,000.00 for two or more persons killed or injured and $10,000.00 for damages to property in any one crash. In lieu thereof, evidence of self-insurance in the amount of $115,000.00 must be filed with the Commissioner. Such financial responsibility shall be maintained and evidenced in a form prescribed by the Commissioner. The standards and process established in subsection 801(c) of this title shall be adopted.

On the Statewide Snowmobile Trail System or on a public right-of-way after the hour of 11:00 p.m. and before the hour of 6:00 a.m., if requested by the landowner or ordered by a town or municipality through ordinance, unless the operation is more than 500 feet from a residence or residences or the operation is taking place to groom the trail. All trails impacted by this subdivision shall be posted to indicate that they are closed between the hours of 11:00 p.m. and 6:00 a.m.

Without proper head and face protection.

No person shall operate, ride in or on a snowmobile, or on a sled or device pulled by a snowmobile on the Statewide Snowmobile Trail System (SSTS) without wearing, upon his or her head, protective headgear of a type approved by the Commissioner, unless the operator of the snowmobile is in the process of grooming the trail. The headgear shall be equipped with a strap to secure the headgear in place.

No person shall operate a snowmobile on the SSTS that is not equipped with a factory-installed or approved factory or aftermarket replacement windshield that adequately protects the operator’s face, or the operator shall wear eyeglasses, goggles, or a protective face shield.

During the closed season on the Statewide Snowmobile Trail System or any public land, except for the following purposes:

grooming operations;

trail maintenance; or

search and rescue operations conducted by law enforcement officers defined in subdivision 3302(2) of this title or emergency medical personnel defined in

24 V.S.A. § 2651(6)

or emergency use by fire service personnel defined in

20 V.S.A. § 3151

or private individuals who are assisting such officers or personnel.

During the open season when the Statewide Snowmobile Trail System has not been officially opened by the Vermont Association of Snow Travelers, Inc., due to lack of snow or for temporary closures caused by lack of snow or dangerous trail conditions, except for the following purposes:

grooming operations;

trail maintenance; or

search and rescue operations conducted by law enforcement officers defined in subdivision 3302(2) of this title or emergency medical personnel defined in

24 V.S.A. § 2651(6)

or emergency use by fire service personnel defined in

20 V.S.A. § 3151

or private individuals who are assisting such officers or personnel.

It shall be an affirmative defense to a prosecution for trespass under subdivision (b)(5) of this section that the operator of the snowmobile was unable, after a reasonable diligent search, to locate, within the State of Vermont, a person with authority to grant or deny such permission.

No public or private landowner or their agents shall be liable for any property damage or personal injury sustained by any person operating or riding as a passenger on a snowmobile, or upon a vehicle or other device drawn by a snowmobile upon the public or private landowner’s property, whether or not the public or private landowner has given permission to use the land, unless the public or private landowner charges a cash fee to the operator or owner of the snowmobile for the use of the property, or unless the damage or injury is intentionally inflicted by the landowner.
(d) (1) No public or private landowner or their agents shall be liable for any property damage or personal injury sustained by any person operating or riding as a passenger on a snowmobile, or upon a vehicle or other device drawn by a snowmobile upon the public or private landowner’s property, whether or not the public or private landowner has given permission to use the land, unless the public or private landowner charges a cash fee to the operator or owner of the snowmobile for the use of the property, or unless the damage or injury is intentionally inflicted by the landowner.

If VAST has exercised reasonable care in marking the boundaries of the SSTS, it shall not be liable for ordinary negligence for any property damage or personal injury sustained by any person that arises from operation of a snowmobile outside the SSTS. However, VAST’s liability shall not be limited under this subdivision if an operator leaves the SSTS because of an unsafe condition on the SSTS and the damage or injury occurs before the operator is able to return safely to the SSTS.

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1987, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 2;

1989, No. 247

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1993, No. 234

(Adj. Sess.), § 5, eff. Nov. 1, 1994;

1995, No. 64

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. Jan. 30, 1996;

1999, No. 20

, §§ 5-7;

2001, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), § 4, eff. June 12, 2002;

2003, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 3, 5;

2015, No. 47

, § 47;

2015, No. 102

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2017, No. 83

, § 161(4);

2019, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. July 13, 2020;

2021, No. 20

, § 251.

§ 3207.
Penalties and revocation of registration; SWI; privilege; suspension; criminal penalty.

A person who violates any of the following sections of this title shall be subject to a civil penalty of $35.00 for each violation:

Click to view

(g)

The Commissioner or his or her authorized agent may suspend or revoke the registration of any snowmobile registered in this State and repossess the number and certificate to it, when he or she is satisfied that:

a snowmobile has been stolen;

the registrant is not the legal owner;

a snowmobile is operated without proper equipment after the owner has been notified by a law enforcement officer to procure and use such equipment as is required by law or Department rules; or

the owner of a snowmobile has perpetrated some fraud upon the Department of Motor Vehicles.

(h)

Civil penalties established under this section shall be mandatory and may not be reduced.

§ 3203
failure to return transferred registration
§ 3205(a)-(c)
operation with defective or inadequate equipment, except improper muffling device
§ 3205(e)
sale of a snowmobile for operation without required equipment; improper operation; permitting improper operation
§ 3206(b)(8)
by a person without a certificate of snowmobile education
§ 3206(b)(1)(D)
by a person under 16 years of age
§ 3206(b)(10)
display of registration plate (b) A person who violates any of the following sections of this title shall be subject to a civil penalty of $55.00 for each violation:
§ 3206(b)(1)
on a public highway
§ 3206(b)(2), (3)
on a plowed highway
§ 3206(b)(4)
on a municipal highway
§ 3206(b)(13)
in cemeteries
§ 3206(b)(14)
interstate and limited access highways
§ 3206(b)(15)
sidewalks (c) A person who violates any of the following sections of this title shall be subject to a civil penalty of $135.00 for each violation:
§ 3202
operation of an unregistered snowmobile
§ 3205(a)
alterations made to headlight lenses
§ 3206(a)
permitting operation of an unregistered snowmobile
§ 3206(b)(6)
natural area
§ 3206(b)(20)
trail access limited
§ 3206(b)(21)
failure to wear proper protective headgear (d) A person who violates any of the following sections of this title shall be subject to a civil penalty of $300.00 for each violation:
§ 3204(b)
misuse of manufacturer’s/seller’s registration
§ 3206(b)(5)
private land or private body of water
§ 3206(b)(16)
operation after privilege suspended
§ 3206(b)(17)
operation of a snowmobile in unreasonable manner
§ 3206(b)(18)(C)
display of improper TMA by a snowmobile used in a commercial operation
§ 3206(b)(18)(D)
failure to display commercial identification
§ 3209
defacing numbers on snowmobiles
§ 3209a
defacing trail signs (e) A person who violates any of the following sections of this title shall be subject to a civil penalty of up to $500.00 for each violation:
§ 3205(d)
operation with an improper muffling device
§ 3206(b)(19)
liability insurance
§ 3206(b)(22)
operation of a snowmobile in closed or open
and (23)
season
§ 3206(b)(9)(A)
harassing wildlife (f) A person who violates any of the following provisions of this title shall be imprisoned for not more than one year or fined not more than $1,000.00, or both. If the person has been previously convicted of the same violation, the person shall be imprisoned for not more than two years or fined not more than $3,000.00, or both:
§ 3206(b)(9)(B)
intentionally causing animal pain or suffering
§ 3206(b)(12)
reckless operation PARASTAT=“s” DESISTAT=“”>
§ 3211
leaving scene of a crash
§ 3212
attempting to elude law enforcement officer

HISTORY:

Added

1983, No. 212

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

1991, No. 165

(Adj. Sess.), § 9;

1993, No. 234

(Adj. Sess.), § 6, eff. Nov. 1, 1994;

1999, No. 20

, §§ 8, 11;

2001, No. 126

(Adj. Sess.), §§ 5, 6, eff. June 12, 2002;

2003, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

2019, No. 131

(Adj. Sess.), § 233;

2019, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 23, eff. July 13, 2020.

§ 3207a.
Operating under the influence of alcohol or drugs; SWI.

A person shall not operate, attempt to operate, or be in actual physical control of a snowmobile on any lands, waters, or public highways of this State:

when the person’s alcohol concentration is 0.08 or more; or

when the person is under the influence of alcohol; or

when the person is under the influence of any other drug or under the combined influence of alcohol and any other drug to a degree that renders the person incapable of safely operating a snowmobile.

A person who is a habitual user of or under the influence of any narcotic drug or who is under the influence of any other drug, substance, or inhalant other than alcohol to a degree that renders the person incapable of safely operating a snowmobile may not operate, attempt to operate, or be in actual physical control of a snowmobile.

The fact that a person charged with a violation of this section is or has been entitled to use such drug under the laws of this State shall not constitute a defense against any charge of violating this section.

A person may not be convicted of more than one offense under this section arising out of the same incident.

As used in this section, “alcohol” includes “alcohol,” “malt beverages,” “spirits,” “fortified wines,” and “vinous beverages” as defined in

7 V.S.A. § 2

, and any beverage or liquid containing any of them.

As used in this section, “drug” means a regulated drug as defined in

18 V.S.A. § 4201

.

If a person violates this section on a public highway, that person may be convicted of a violation of this section or a violation of section 1201 of this title, but not both.

Any person who is convicted of violating this section shall have his or her privilege to operate a snowmobile suspended for a period of one year and until the person complies with section 1209a of this title. Additionally, a person convicted of violating the provisions of this section shall be penalized under the provisions of section 1210 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 234

(Adj. Sess.), § 7, eff. Nov. 1, 1994; amended

1999, No. 20

, § 10;

2003, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2017, No. 83

, § 154.

§ 3207b.
Preliminary screening device.

When a law enforcement officer has reason to believe that a person may be violating or has violated section 3207a of this title, the officer may request the person to provide a sample of breath for a preliminary screening test using a device approved by the Commissioner of Health for this purpose. The person shall not have the right to consult an attorney prior to submitting to this preliminary breath alcohol screening test. The results of this preliminary screening test may be used for the purpose of deciding whether an arrest should be made and whether to request an evidentiary test and shall not be used in any court proceeding except on those issues. Following the screening test, additional tests may be required of the operator pursuant to the provisions of section 1202 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 234

(Adj. Sess.), § 8, eff. Nov. 1, 1994.

§ 3207c.
Implied consent.

Any person who operates, attempts to operate, or is in actual physical control of a snowmobile on any lands, waters, or public highways of this State is deemed to have given consent to the taking of more than one sample of his or her breath or blood for the purpose of determining the alcoholic content of his or her blood. The samples shall be taken and the tests administered and analyzed consistently with the provisions of sections 1202, 1203, and 1203a of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1993, No. 234

(Adj. Sess.), § 9, eff. Nov. 1, 1994.